District of Columbia statutes.
8-1503

Registration; fee.

(a)

Pursuant to rules issued by the Mayor in accordance with § 8-1506, beginning in 1991, any person who generates waste in the District shall register annually with the Mayor on a form prescribed by the Mayor and pay an annual registration fee to be established by the Mayor. Any generator who fails to register as required by this section shall be fined an amount not to exceed $5,000 for each day of noncompliance and may be required to forfeit any right, license, permit, or privilege to possess radioactive materials in the District.

(b)

Any registration issued pursuant to this section shall be issued as a Public Health: Radioactive Equipment endorsement to a basic business license under the basic business license system as set forth in subchapter I-A of Chapter 28 of Title 47.

Mar. 7, 1991, D.C. Law 8-226, § 4, 38 DCR 219
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(n), 46 DCR 3142
Oct. 28, 2003, D.C. Law 15-38, § 3(n), 50 DCR 6913
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(n) of Streamlining Regulation Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-145, August 11, 2003, 50 DCR 6896).
D.C. Law 15-38, in subsec. (b), substituted “Public Health: Radioactive Equipment endorsement to a basic business license under the basic” for “Class A Public Health: Radioactive Equipment endorsement to a master business license under the master”.
1981 Ed., § 6-3703.